South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5278.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-5-120(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) EveryOnly a citizen of this State and of the United States who applies for registration must be registered if he meets the following qualifications: (1) meets the age qualification as provided in Section 4, Article II of the Constitution of this State; (2) is not laboring under disabilities named in the Constitution of 1895 of this State; and (3) is a resident in the county and in the polling precinct in which the elector offers to vote. SECTION 2.  Section 7-5-675 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-5-675. The State Elections Commission shall implement a system in order to issue voter registration cards with a photograph of the elector. This voter registration card may be used for voting purposes only. No voter registration card may be issued to a person who is not a United States citizen. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----